Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-655
Violations; injunction.

Any violation of the provisions of sections 46-651 to 46-655 may be enjoined in an action brought in the district court of the county in which such violation or any attempted or threatened violation occurs.

Laws 1965, c. 270, § 5, p. 772.